Illinois, session 104th, HB557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Social Services Contract Notice Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 596/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Social Services Contract Notice Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-153, eff. 8-18-17.)